Georgia, session 2025_26, HB118.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 1A of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to early care and
learning, is amended in Code Section 20-1A-2, relating to definitions, by adding a new
paragraph to read as follows:
"(10.1) 'Portable airway clearance device' means a portable medical device that uses
manually created suction to remove a blockage from the airway during a choking
emergency."
H. B. 118
- 1 -

LC 55 0412
SECTION 2.
Said chapter is further amended in Code Section 20-1A-10, relating to regulation of early
care and education programs, by adding a new subsection to read as follows:
"(g.1) Child care learning centers and family child care learning homes shall:
(1) Maintain on the premises of such center or home at least one portable airway
clearance device; and
(2) Ensure that each employee of such center or home who cares for or supervises
children at such center or home is certified in cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR)
within 45 days of beginning his or her employment with such center or home."
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 118
- 2 -